Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3136
Liquidating asset.

(a) In this section, liquidating asset means an asset whose value will diminish or terminate because the asset is expected to produce receipts for a period of limited duration. The term includes a leasehold, patent, copyright, royalty right, and right to receive payments during a period of more than one year under an arrangement that does not provide for the payment of interest on the unpaid balance. The term does not include a payment subject to section 30-3135, resources subject to section 30-3137, timber subject to section 30-3138, an activity subject to section 30-3140, an asset subject to section 30-3141, or any asset for which the trustee establishes a reserve for depreciation under section 30-3144.

(b) A trustee shall allocate to income ten percent of the receipts from a liquidating asset and the balance to principal.

Laws 2001, LB 56, § 21.